District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.57

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3208, 51 DCR 8441
Delegation of Authority pursuant to the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of 2000 and Section 3208 of the Office of Unified Communications Establishment Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2009-85, May 27, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6826).